Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.220

Reinstatement after appeal, guaranteed rights and benefits.

Any employee, when fully reinstated after appeal, shall be guaranteed all employee rights and benefits, including back pay, sick leave, vacation accrual, retirement and OASDI credits.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 416; 1961 c 1 s 22 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.